Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1593
Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act and procurement, operation, and disposition of property provisions.

The following provisions of law, and any regulations relating thereto, shall not apply to a local housing agency unless the legislation imposing such requirements is expressly and specifically applicable to local housing agencies or the local housing agency expressly elects to be governed by such legislation or regulations:

(1) The Administrative Procedure Act; and

(2) Any law, resolution, ordinance, or regulation governing or otherwise applicable to the procurement of goods and services, or to the acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by public agencies of this state, including any requirements for delivery of payment or performance bonds by contractors.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 22.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.